District of Columbia statutes.
16-4409

Initiation of arbitration.

(a)

A person initiates an arbitration proceeding by giving notice in a record to the other parties to the agreement to arbitrate by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested and obtained, or by service as authorized for the commencement of a civil action. The notice shall describe the nature of the controversy and the remedy sought.

(b)

Unless a person objects for lack or insufficiency of notice under § 16-4415(c) not later than the beginning of the arbitration hearing, the person, by appearing at the hearing, waives any objection to lack of or insufficiency of notice.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

History

This section is referenced in § 16-4404, § 16-4419, and § 16-4423.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).

Editor's Notes